District of Columbia statutes.
36-301.22

Retail service station security public service announcement.

Within 90 days after October 22, 2009, the Metropolitan Police Department shall produce a public service announcement video which will be available for broadcast on the cable television channels allocated to the District government and made accessible at the Metropolitan Police Department website warning consumers of the potential dangers at retail service stations.

Apr. 19, 1977 D.C. Law 1-123, § 3-122
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-65, § 2, 56 DCR 6606
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 27, 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 36-302.22.
2001 Ed., §  36-302.22.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated subchapter II-A of this chapter as subchapter I-A; and renumbered former § 36-302.22 as § 36-301.22.